Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.09
Delayed birth certificate; petition; accompanying documents.

A statement of the department indicating why a delayed certificate of birth was not issued and registered and all documentary evidence which was submitted to the department in support of such registration shall accompany a petition filed under section 71-617.08.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 533;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 148;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 423.